New York, session 2025-2026, A8509.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 131-a of the social services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 16 to read as follows: 3 16. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule or regulation 4 to the contrary, a homeless family household with dependent children 5 applying for or receiving temporary housing assistance in Westchester 6 county shall not be required to contribute any earned income to room and 7 board, or to eliminate their need for temporary housing assistance, or 8 as a condition to receive temporary housing assistance from such provid- 9 er. For the purposes of this subdivision, any Westchester county provid- 10 er of temporary housing assistance or short-term housing shall include, 11 but not be limited to, a family shelter, a hotel, an emergency apart- 12 ment, a domestic violence shelter, or a transitional unit. 13 (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as permitting the state 14 to reimburse Westchester county for temporary housing for homeless fami- 15 lies with earned income at a rate of less than one hundred percent, and 16 shall be treated as if Westchester county were still obtaining contrib- 17 utions from these households. 18 (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as creating any addi- 19 tional requirement for Westchester county to provide temporary housing 20 assistance or short-term housing. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 22 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall expire and be 23 deemed repealed two years after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11612-01-5